src/fastspell_dictionaries/sc_IT.dic
abbabbiocare/Hb
abbacare/Hb
abbadinare/Hb
abbagadiare/Hb
abbagnare/Hb
abbajonare/Hb
abballalloare/Hb
abballinare/Hb
abballonare/Hb
abbaltare/Hb
abbaltzare/Hb
abbandhonare/Hb
abbare/Hb
abbarrare/Hb
abbastare/Hb
abbatare/Hb
abbaucare/Hb
abbelare/Hb
abbenenare/Hb
abbentrare/Hb
abberguare/Hb
abbilantzare/Hb
abbirgontzare/Hb
abbisastrare/Hb
abbitare/Hb
abbonare/Hb
abbotinare/Hb
abbovare/Hb
abbrancare/Hb
abbrandhare/Hb
abbrannare/Hb
abbratzare/Hb
abbrentare/Hb
abbroare/Hb
abbrussare/Hb
abbubbulicare/Hb
abbubbullicare/Hb
abbumbare/Hb
abbunzare/Hb
abbusare/Hb
abbutinare/Hb
abbutonare/Hb
abbuzare/Hb
acadassare/Hb
acamare/Hb
acanarjare/Hb
acantzare/Hb
acarare/Hb
acasare/Hb
acasatzare/Hb
acassare/Hb
acatare/Hb
achedare/Hb
achepudhare/Hb
acherare/Hb
achichinare/Hb
acometare/Hb
acontzare/Hb
acorare/Hb
acordare/Hb
acotzare/Hb
acotzulare/Hb
acriare/Hb
acucare/Hb
acumpanzare/Hb
acuntentare/Hb
acusare/Hbg
acussertare/Hb
acussorzare/Hb
addatare/Hb
adderetare/Hb
addescare/Hb
addestrare/Hb
addevinare/Hb
addibbare/Hb
additzionare/Hb
addorare/Hb
addossare/Hb
addromare/Hb
adotare/Hb
afrontare/Hb
afrunzedhare/Hb
afumare/Hb
afumentare/Hb
afunare/Hb
afundhare/Hb
aggangrenare/Hb
aggantzare/Hb
aggradare/Hb
aggravare/Hb
aggrodhare/Hb
agguantare/Hb
airare/Hb
aiscurtare/Hb
allagazare/Hb
allargare/Hb
allatare/Hb
allegare/Hb
allegrare/Hb
allizare/Hb
ammadurare/Hb
ammirare/Hb
ammorare/Hb
ammoratzare/Hb
ammuntonare/Hb
amorare/Hb
andhare/Hb
annotare/Hb
apassionare/Hb
apetzare/Hb
apicare/Hb
aporare/Hb
apostare/Hb
apricare/Hb
aprontare/Hb
aprovare/Hb
apuntare/Hb
arare/Hb
armare/Hb
arranzare/Hb
arrastare/Hb
arredare/Hb
arrimare/Hb
arriscare/Hb
arruinare/Hb
arrumbare/Hb
aspetare/Hb
assachizare/Hb
assardare/Hb
assentare/Hb
assolare/Hb
assuconare/Hb
aterrare/Hb
atirare/Hb
atitare/Hb
ativare/Hb
atontare/Hb
atracare/Hb
atraessare/Hb
atristare/Hb
atzapare/Hb
atzitzare/Hb
autorizare/Hb
avalorare/Hb
avisare/Hb
avistare/Hb
azustare/Hb
bacarzare/Hb
ballare/Hb
bardanare/Hb
basare/Hb
bastare/Hb
befare/Hb
bendhare/Hb
berrinare/Hb
bicare/Hb
bombardare/Hb
botzare/Hb
bucare/Hb
bufare/Hb
buscare/Hb
campare/Hb
campitzare/Hb
cangrenare/Hb
cannonare/Hb
cantare/Hb
capitare/Hb
carasare/Hb
carbonizare/Hb
carignare/Hb
carinnare/Hb
carotare/Hb
cascare/Hb
chircare/Hb
chirrare/Hb
chitare/Hb
codhare/Hb
comintzare/Hb
consumare/Hb
contare/Hb
corcare/Hb
coronare/Hb
corpare/Hb
corrutare/Hb
cossizare/Hb
costare/Hb
costumare/Hb
crastare/Hb
cravare/Hb
creare/Hb
crepare/Hb
criare/Hb
cristallizare/Hb
cufessare/Hb
cufetare/Hb
cufortare/Hb
cufrontare/Hb
cumandhare/Hb
cumbinare/Hb
cumpessare/Hb
cundennare/Hb
cunfinare/Hb
cuntentare/Hb
cuntrestare/Hb
cunzare/Hb
curare/Hb
cussiderare/Hb
cussolare/Hb
dassare/Hb
decretare/Hb
depurare/Hb
destinare/Hb
determinare/Hb
dimandhare/Hb
dirgustare/Hb
disabesare/Hb
disamparare/Hb
disatinare/Hb
discuntentare/Hb
disinfetare/Hb
disizare/Hb
disonorare/Hb
dissignare/Hb
disterrare/Hb
dolare/Hb
dotare/Hb
dudare/Hb
duritare/Hb
eletrizare/Hb
eredare/Hb
esportare/Hb
espricare/Hb
falare/Hb
farrascare/Hb
fascare/Hb
ferrare/Hb
fidantzare/Hb
figurare/Hb
fissare/Hb
fortzare/Hb
frastimare/Hb
fratazare/Hb
frazellare/Hb
frenare/Hb
fricare/Hb
froghedhare/Hb
frutare/Hb
fundhare/Hb
furare/Hb
gastare/Hb
gherrare/Hb
ghetare/Hb
ghindhare/Hb
giurare/Hb
granzolare/Hb
guastare/Hb
ifritare/Hb
illargare/Hb
imbarcare/Hb
imbelare/Hb
imbetzare/Hb
imbitzare/Hb
imbozare/Hb
imbucare/Hb
impamentare/Hb
imparare/Hb
imparisare/Hb
impazinare/Hb
impercare/Hb
impestare/Hb
impiastrare/Hb
impinnare/Hb
importare/Hb
impostare/Hb
imprendhare/Hb
impresonare/Hb
imprestare/Hb
improsare/Hb
impudare/Hb
incaminare/Hb
incannare/Hb
incannitare/Hb
incapare/Hb
incarare/Hb
incarcare/Hb
incartare/Hb
incatramare/Hb
inchimerare/Hb
incollare/Hb
incorare/Hb
incordedhare/Hb
incoronare/Hb
incorrare/Hb
incotzare/Hb
incrastare/Hb
incresurare/Hb
incumandhare/Hb
incurare/Hb
incurtziare/Hb
indiosare/Hb
indivinare/Hb
indurcare/Hb
infetare/Hb
infunare/Hb
inghisare/Hb
ingrassare/Hb
ingustare/Hb
innestare/Hb
innudare/Hb
insedhare/Hb
intanare/Hb
intatzare/Hb
interrare/Hb
intimare/Hb
intolare/Hb
intostare/Hb
intramesare/Hb
intregare/Hb
intritzare/Hb
intupare/Hb
inturtare/Hb
intzertare/Hb
inundhare/Hb
inzulzare/Hb
inzurzare/Hb
irbarcare/Hb
irbarratzare/Hb
irbicare/Hb
irbotare/Hb
irbrossare/Hb
irdebbilitare/Hb
irfarinare/Hb
irfortzare/Hb
irfrancare/Hb
irfurrare/Hb
irganzare/Hb
irghiare/Hb
irgulare/Hb
irmanare/Hb
irmutzurrare/Hb
irrampare/Hb
irratzare/Hb
irvertudare/Hb
irvitare/Hb
isarchilare/Hb
isbarcare/Hb
iscadenare/Hb
iscaminare/Hb
iscantzellare/Hb
iscastare/Hb
iscatarrare/Hb
ischintzidhare/Hb
iscontare/Hb
iscorare/Hb
iscorrutare/Hb
iscostare/Hb
iscotzare/Hb
iscrostare/Hb
iscuncordare/Hb
iscupare/Hb
iscussacrare/Hb
isdoganare/Hb
isossare/Hb
ispalatzare/Hb
ispannare/Hb
ispanzolare/Hb
isparare/Hb
ispedhare/Hb
isperrare/Hb
ispianare/Hb
ispiegare/Hb
ispirare/Hb
ispizare/Hb
isposare/Hb
ispostare/Hb
ispramare/Hb
ispricare/Hb
isprughinare/Hb
ispuntillare/Hb
ispurpare/Hb
issiminzare/Hb
istacare/Hb
istare/Hb
istentare/Hb
istirare/Hb
istonare/Hb
istovocare/Hb
istramare/Hb
istripitare/Hb
istrossare/Hb
istrumpare/Hb
istudare/Hb
istumbare/Hb
istuponare/Hb
isvelare/Hb
limare/Hb
mantzare/Hb
matanare/Hb
messare/Hb
minare/Hbg
mirare/Hb
murrunzare/Hb
mustrare/Hb
nuscare/Hb
organizare/Hb
orizontare/Hb
ovretare/Hb
pasare/Hb
pedalare/Hb
pensionare/Hb
perdonare/Hb
pertocare/Hb
picare/Hb
pilisare/Hb
pinzellare/Hb
piscare/Hb
pistare/Hb
pistorare/Hb
porrogare/Hb
prantzare/Hb
prenare/Hb
presentare/Hb
prestare/Hb
pretzisare/Hb
procurare/Hb
professare/Hb
profetizare/Hb
programmare/Hb
pudare/Hb
purgare/Hb
rapresentare/Hb
registrare/Hb
resurtare/Hb
retratare/Hb
ricatare/Hb
rilegare/Hb
rullare/Hb
rutare/Hb
sanare/Hb
sardare/Hb
secare/Hb
separare/Hb
sicare/Hb
sifonare/Hb
sinnalare/Hbg
sinzare/Hb
sonare/Hb
sorrocrare/Hb
sulare/Hb
superare/Hb
surcare/Hb
suspetare/Hb
sutzare/Hb
tassare/Hb
tebbacare/Hb
tentare/Hb
timbrare/Hb
tocare/Hb
tostare/Hb
trampare/Hb
trapuntare/Hb
traspirare/Hb
trassinnare/Hb
triunfare/Hb
tronare/Hb
truncare/Hb
turrare/Hb
tzacare/Hb
